Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.100

Form of return—Production of person.

The return must be signed and verified by the person making it, who shall state:

(1) The authority or cause of the restraint of the party in his or her custody.

(2) If the authority shall be in writing, he or she shall return a copy and produce the original on the hearing.

(3) If he or she has had the party in his or her custody or under his or her restraint, and has transferred him or her to another, he or she shall state to whom, the time, place, and cause of the transfer. He or she shall produce the party at the hearing unless prevented by sickness or infirmity, which must be shown in the return.

[ 2011 c 336 s 192; Code 1881 s 674; 1877 p 139 s 677; 1869 p 157 s 614; 1854 p 213 s 442; RRS s 1072.]